en: Fuel system application: Carbureted; Diesel high-pressure (injection pump); Diesel lift/transfer; EFI (gasoline); GDI (gasoline direct injection); Universal fit; Other
tr: Yakıt sistemi uygulaması: Karbüratörlü; Dizel yüksek basınçlı (enjeksiyon pompası); Dizel kaldırma/transfer; EFI (benzin); GDI (doğrudan benzin enjeksiyonu); Evrensel uyum; Diğer
fi: Polttoainejärjestelmän sovellus: Kaasutinkone; Dieselkorkeapaine (ruiskutuspumppu); Dieselsiirto; EFI (bensiini); GDI (bensiinin suoraruiskutus); Yleismalli; Muu
vi: Ứng dụng hệ thống nhiên liệu: Bộ chế hòa khí; Bơm cao áp diesel (bơm kim phun); Bơm tiếp vận/bơm đẩy diesel; Phun xăng điện tử (EFI); Phun xăng trực tiếp (GDI); Phù hợp cho mọi dòng xe; Khác
ro-RO: Aplicație pentru sistemul de alimentare cu combustibil: Cu carburator; Diesel de înaltă presiune (pompă de injecție); Ridicare/transfer diesel; Injecție electronică (benzină); GDI (injecție directă pe benzină); Potrivire universală; Altele
sl-SI: Uporaba sistema za gorivo: Z uplinjačem; Visokotlačni dizelski (vbrizgalna črpalka); Nizkotlačni dizelski (prenos); EFI (bencin); GDI (neposredno vbrizgavanje bencina); Univerzalno prileganje; Drugo
lt-LT: Kuro sistemos paskirtis: Karbiuratorinė; Dyzelino aukšto slėgio (įpurškimo siurblys); Dyzelino pakėlimo / perdavimo; EFI (benzinas); GDI (tiesioginis benzino įpurškimas); Universali; Kita
ru: Применение топливной системы: Карбюраторная; Дизельная система высокого давления (ТНВД); Дизельная подкачивающая/перекачивающая; Электронный впрыск топлива / EFI (бензин); Прямой впрыск / GDI (бензин); Универсальная; Другое
el: Εφαρμογή συστήματος καυσίμου: Με καρμπιρατέρ; Υψηλής πίεσης ντίζελ (αντλία ψεκασμού); Προαντλία/μεταφοράς ντίζελ; EFI (βενζίνης); GDI (άμεσος ψεκασμός βενζίνης); Γενικής εφαρμογής; Άλλο
bg-BG: Приложение на горивната система: Карбураторна; Дизел под високо налягане (инжекционна помпа); Дизелова подкачваща/трансферна; EFI (бензин); GDI (бензинов директен инжекцион); Универсална; Друго
sv: Användningsområde för bränslesystem: Med förgasare; Diesel högtryck (insprutningspump); Diesel lyft/överföring; EFI (bensin); GDI (direktinsprutning bensin); Universell passform; Övrigt
sk-SK: Aplikácia v palivovom systéme: Karburátorové; Vysokotlakové dieselové (vstrekovacie čerpadlo); Naftové podávacie/prečerpávacie; EFI (benzín); GDI (priame vstrekovanie benzínu); Univerzálne; Iné
da: Anvendelse i brændstofsystem: Karburator; Diesel højtryk (indsprøjtningspumpe); Diesel løfte-/fødepumpe; EFI (benzin); GDI (direkte benzinindsprøjtning); Universel pasform; Andet
th: แอพพลิเคชั่นระบบเชื้อเพลิง: คาร์บูเรเตอร์; ดีเซลแรงดันสูง (ปั๊มหัวฉีด); ปั๊มแย็ก/ปั๊มส่งดีเซล; EFI (เบนซิน); GDI (ฉีดตรงเบนซิน); แบบยูนิเวอร์ซัล; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Aplicação do sistema de combustível: Carburado; Alta pressão a diesel (bomba de injeção); Elevação/transferência a diesel; EFI (gasolina); GDI (injeção direta de gasolina); Encaixe universal; Outro
es: Aplicación del sistema de combustible: Carburado; Diésel de alta presión (bomba de inyección); Elevación/transferencia de diésel; EFI (gasolina); GDI (inyección directa de gasolina); Ajuste universal; Otro
pl: Generator układu paliwowego: Gaźnik; Diesel wysokociśnieniowy (pompa wtryskowa); Diesel tłoczący/przesyłowy; Elektroniczny wtrysk paliwa (EFI - benzyna); Bezpośredni wtrysk paliwa (GDI - benzyna); Uniwersalny; Inny
fr: Application du système de carburant: À carburateur; Diesel haute pression (pompe à injection); Pompe de gavage/transfert (diesel); EFI (essence); GDI (injection directe d'essence); Universel; Autre
it: Applicazione per il sistema di alimentazione: A carburatore; Diesel ad alta pressione (pompa di iniezione); Sollevamento/trasferimento diesel; EFI (benzina); GDI (iniezione diretta di benzina); Universale; Altro
hr-HR: Primjena sustava goriva: Rasplinjač; Visokotlačni dizel (ubrizgavajuća pumpa); Dizel podizna/prijenosna pumpa; EFI (benzin); GDI (izravno ubrizgavanje benzina); Univerzalno; Ostalo
cs: Typ palivové soustavy: Karburátorový; Vysokotlaký diesel (vstřikovací čerpadlo); Diesel podávací/přečerpávací; EFI (benzín); GDI (přímé vstřikování benzínu); Univerzální; Ostatní
ko: 연료 시스템 적용 분야: 카뷰레터식; 디젤 고압(분사 펌프); 디젤 리프트/트랜스퍼; EFI(가솔린); GDI(가솔린 직접 분사); 유니버설 핏; 기타
zh-CN: 燃油系统应用: 化油器式; 柴油高压（喷油泵）; 柴油举升/输送; EFI（汽油）; GDI（汽油直喷）; 通用型; 其他
de: Einsatzbereich des Kraftstoffsystems: Vergaser; Diesel-Hochdruck (Einspritzpumpe); Diesel-Förderpumpe; EFI (Benzin); GDI (Benzindirekteinspritzung); Universelle Passform; Sonstige
hu: Üzemanyagrendszer-alkalmazás: Karburátoros; Dízel nagy nyomású (adagolószivattyú); Dízel emelő-/továbbítószivattyú; EFI (benzin); GDI (közvetlen benzinbefecskendezéses); Univerzális; Egyéb
nb: Drivstoffsystem-app: Med forgasser; Diesel høytrykk (innsprøytningspumpe); Diesel løfte-/overføring; EFI (bensin); GDI (direkte bensininnsprøytning); Universell passform; Annet
zh-TW: 燃油系統適用架構: 化油器系統; 柴油高壓 (噴射泵); 柴油輸油/輸送; EFI (汽油); GDI (汽油缸內直噴); 通用型; 其他
ja: 燃料システム適用: キャブレター式; ディーゼル高圧 (インジェクションポンプ); ディーゼルリフト/トランスファー; EFI (ガソリン); GDI (ガソリン直噴); ユニバーサルフィット; その他
pt-BR: Aplicação do sistema de combustível: Carburado; Diesel de alta pressão (bomba injetora); Transferência/elevação a diesel; EFI (gasolina); GDI (injeção direta de gasolina); Tamanho universal; Outro
nl: Brandstofsysteem toepassing: Met carburateur; Diesel hogedruk (injectiepomp); Diesel opvoer/overdracht; EFI (benzine); GDI (directe benzine-injectie); Universele pasvorm; Anders